South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3555.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 59-71-40 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 59-71-40.  The election hereby required shall be ordered by the authorities, who shall fix the date thereof on the first Tuesday after the first Monday of November of any year and prescribe the form of the notice of the holding of the election. Advices of the action thus taken by the authorities shall be transmitted to the commissioners of election for the county, or counties, wherein the election is to be held. It shall thereupon become the duty of the commissioners of election to conduct the election so ordered. To that end, the commissioners of election shall prescribe the form of ballot, arrange for voting places in each precinct, or any part of a precinct, constituting all or a portion of the operating school unit, appoint managers, and receive the returns of the election. After duly canvassing the returns, the commissioners of election shall declare the results thereof and certify such results to the authorities. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----